apertium-eng-kaz.kaz.lexc
LEXICON NP-COG-OB

! For cognoms ending with -ов, -ев
! They derive feminine equivalets taking -а /I.S./
! Also, even the ев ones are normally pronounced
!    (and take harmony) as if they end in йыф/йып

%<np%>%<cog%>%<m%>:%{☭%} NP-COMMON ;                       ! Dir/LR
%<np%>%<cog%>%<m%>%<pl%>:%{☭%}%>%{L%}%{A%}р NP-COMMON ;    ! Dir/LR

%<np%>%<cog%>%<m%>:%{а%}%{с%} NP-COMMON ;
%<np%>%<cog%>%<m%>%<pl%>:%{а%}%{с%}%>%{L%}%{A%}р NP-COMMON ;

NP-COG-OBIN-FEM ;


LEXICON NP-COG-IN

! For cognoms ending with -ов, -ев, -ин
! They derive feminine equivalets taking -а /I.S./

%<np%>%<cog%>%<m%>:%{☭%} NP-COMMON ;
%<np%>%<cog%>%<m%>%<pl%>:%{☭%}%>%{L%}%{A%}р NP-COMMON ;

NP-COG-OBIN-FEM ;

LEXICON NPCOGFLEX

! This isn't used at the moment,
! but e.g. ?Polish cognoms ending with -ска would take this cont.class /I.S./ 

LEXICON NP-PAT-VICH

! For patronyms ending with -вич
! Their feminine equivalets end with -вна /I.S./

%<np%>%<pat%>%<m%>:вич%{☭%} NP-COMMON ;

%<np%>%<pat%>%<f%>:вна NP-COMMON ;

LEXICON NP-ORG

%<np%>%<org%>: CASE ; 

LEXICON NP-ORG-COMPOUND 

%<np%>%<org%>: N-COMPOUND-PX-COMMON ;   ! COMMON because no plural

LEXICON NP-AL

%<np%>%<al%>: CASE ; 

LEXICON NUM-COMMON

%<num%>: # ;
%<num%>%<subst%>: SUBST ;

LEXICON NUM

NUM-COMMON ;
%<num%>%<ord%>:%>%{I%}нш%{I%} # ;             ! FIXME: base form, <det> reading
%<num%>%<ord%>:%>%{I%}нш%{I%} N-INFL-COMMON ;

LEXICON NUM-TWENTY

NUM-COMMON ;
%<num%>%<ord%>:%>с%{I%}нш%{I%} N-INFL-COMMON ;

LEXICON NUM-ITG ! This is a temporal solution
                ! (could be integrated with the above)

%<num%>%<itg%>: # ;
%<num%>%<itg%>%<subst%>: SUBST ;
%<num%>%<itg%>%<ord%>:%>%{I%}нш%{I%} N-INFL-COMMON ;

LEXICON NUM-COLL

%<num%>%<coll%>%<subst%>: N-INFL-COMMON ;
%<num%>%<coll%>%<advl%>: # ;

LEXICON NUM-ROMAN

%<num%>%<ord%>: # ;

LEXICON DIGITLEX

%<num%>: # ;

LEXICON POST

%<post%>: COMMON-CLITICS ;

LEXICON POSTADV

%<postadv%>: # ;

!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!

LEXICON KI

%<attr%>:%>%{G%}%{I%} COMMON-CLITICS ;

LEXICON ADV

%<adv%>: COMMON-CLITICS ;

LEXICON ADV-WITH-KI

ADV ;
%<adv%>: KI ;

LEXICON ADV-WITH-KI-I     ! Used only for бері<adv>/бергі<adv><attr> right now

:і ADV ;
%<adv%>: KI ;

LEXICON ADVITG

%<adv%>%<itg%>: # ;

!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!

LEXICON CC

%<cnjcoo%>: # ;

LEXICON CS

%<cnjsub%>: # ; 

LEXICON CA

%<cnjadv%>: CLIT-GHANA-ETC ;

LEXICON QST

%<qst%>: # ;

LEXICON MOD-ASS

%<mod_ass%>: # ;

LEXICON MOD

! шығар, сияқты etc.

%<mod%>: # ;

LEXICON INTERJ

%<ij%>: # ;

LEXICON IDEO

%<ideo%>: # ;

LEXICON ABBR

%<abbr%>: # ;


!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!
!!!                          L E X I C O N                                  !!!
!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!

!======================!
 LEXICON ModalParticles
!======================!

ма:%~ма QST ; ! "" Dir/RL
ма:ма QST ; ! "" Dir/LR
ма:ба QST ; ! "" Dir/LR
ма:па QST ; ! "" Dir/LR
ма:ме QST ; ! "" Dir/LR
ма:бе QST ; ! "" Dir/LR
ма:пе QST ; ! "" Dir/LR
ма% не:%~ма% не QST ; ! "" Dir/RL
ма% не:ма% не QST ; ! "" Dir/LR
ма% не:ме% не QST ; ! "" Dir/LR
ше:ше QST ; ! ""

ғой:%~ғой MOD-ASS ; ! "" Dir/RL
ғой:ғой MOD-ASS ; ! "" Dir/LR
ғой:қой MOD-ASS ; ! "" Dir/LR

шығар:шығар MOD ; ! FIXME actually a verb, takes personal suffixes (V-PERS-S1);
                  !   ... more like <vaux><pres> than like a full verb -JNW
                  ! requires some transfer rules as e.g. in the following:
                  !# (kaz) Олар мүмкiн көп кiтап оқыған шығар.
                  !# (tat) Алар бәлки күп китап укыганнардыр.
                  !# (kir) Алар мүмкүн көп китеп окугандыр.


!===================!
 LEXICON Postadverbs
!===================!


%-ақ:%-ақ POSTADV ; ! ""

ғана:%~ғана POSTADV ; ! Dir/RL
ғана:ғана POSTADV ;   ! "only" Dir/LR
ғана:қана POSTADV ;   ! "only" Dir/LR

да:%~да POSTADV ; ! "1. even if"     Dir/RL
да:да POSTADV ; ! ""       Dir/LR
да:де POSTADV ; ! ""       Dir/LR
да:та POSTADV ; ! ""       Dir/LR
да:те POSTADV ; ! ""       Dir/LR

тағы POSTADV ; ! "... дагы" = "and ... too" ! FIXME:CHECK pos
тегіс POSTADV ; ! "entirely/all/all together"


!================!
 LEXICON Pronouns
!================!

PersonalPronouns ;

DemonstrativePronouns ;

InterrogativePronouns ;

басқа:басқа PRON-IND ; ! "other"
бірдеме:бірдеме PRON-IND ; ! "something"
бір% нәрсе:бір% нәрсе PRON-IND ; ! "something" Use/MT
кей:кей PRON-IND ; ! "some" FIXME CHECK

барлық:барлық PRON-QNT ; ! ""
бәрі:бәр PRON-QNT-POSS ; ! "everyone"  ! FIXME: in the end, this really shouldn't create <px*> tags too (same problem for kymorph)
! бәрі PRON-IND ; ! "everyone"  !!! This is an alternate of below ! FIXME: true for Kazakh too?
біреу:біреу PRON-QNT ; ! ""
әркім:әркім PRON-QNT ; ! ""

ешкім:ешкім PRNNEG ; ! ""
ешнәрсе:ешнәрсе PRNNEG ; ! ""
еш% нәрсе:еш% нәрсе PRNNEG ; ! "" Use/MT
ештеңе:ештеңе PRNNEG ; ! ""

бір%-бір:бір%-бір PRON-RECIP ; ! "each other, one another"

өз:өз PRON-REF ; ! "self"


!===================!
 LEXICON Determiners
!===================!


анау:анау DET-DEM ;
әлгі:әлгі DET-DEM ; ! "~этот"
бұл:бұл DET-DEM ;
ол:ол DET-DEM ;
мынау:мынау DET-DEM ;
ол:ол DET-DEM ;
осы:осы DET-DEM ;
сол:сол DET-DEM ;
сонау:сонау DET-DEM ;
осынау:осынау DET-DEM ;

әр:әр DET-QNT ; ! "every"
әрбір:әрбір DET-QNT ; ! "each"
әрбір:һәрбір DET-QNT ; ! "each" Dir/LR
әртүрлі:әртүрлі DET-QNT ; ! "~every kind"
әр:һәр DET-QNT ; ! "every" Dir/LR
бар:бар DET-QNT ; ! "all"
барлық:барлық DET-QNT ; ! "all"
бірқатар:бірқатар DET-QNT ; ! "several"
бірнеше:бірнеше DET-QNT ; ! "some"
бүкіл:бүкіл DET-QNT ; ! "whole"
көптеген:көптеген DET-QNT ; ! "many"
қанша:қанша DET-QNT ; ! "how many"

ондаған:ондаған DET-QNT ; ! ""
жүздеген:жүздеген DET-QNT ; ! ""
мыңдаған:мыңдаған DET-QNT ; ! ""
түмендеген:түмендеген DET-QNT ; ! ""
миллиондаған:миллиондаған DET-QNT ; ! ""
миллиардтаған:миллиардтаған DET-QNT ; ! ""
күллі:күллі DET-QNT ; ! ""
исі:исі DET-QNT ; ! ""

әлдебір:әлдебір DET-IND ; ! "a"
бір:бір DET-IND ; ! "a"
кей:кей DET-IND ; ! "some"
кейбір:кейбір DET-IND ; ! "some"
қайсыбір:қайсыбір DET-IND ; ! "some"
әлденеше:әлденеше DET-IND ; ! ""
бірер:бірер DET-IND ; ! ""

қай:қай DET-ITG ; ! "which"
қайсы:қайсы DET-ITG ; ! "which"

ешбір:ешбір DET-NEG ; ! "none, no"
ешқандай:ешқандай DET-NEG ; ! "no [kind of], none"

өз:өз DET-REF ; ! "oneself's"


!=====================!
 LEXICON Interjections
!=====================!


ау:ау INTERJ ; ! ""
ә:ә INTERJ ; ! ""
әй:әй INTERJ ; ! ""
әйе:әйе INTERJ ; ! "yes"
әлбетте:әлбетте INTERJ ; ! "of course"
әрине:әрине INTERJ ; ! "of course"
әттең:әттең INTERJ ; ! ""
бәрекелді:бәрекелді INTERJ ; ! ""
бәсе:бәсе INTERJ ; ! ""
болыпты:болыпты INTERJ ; ! "okay / that's it"
дариға:дариға INTERJ ; ! ""
демек:демек INTERJ ; ! "that is"
дұрыс:дұрыс INTERJ ; ! "right"
ей:ей INTERJ ; ! ""
жарайды:жарайды INTERJ ; ! "okay / it'll do"
жоқ:жоқ INTERJ ; ! "no"
иә:иә INTERJ ; ! "yes"
қане:қане INTERJ ; ! "where" ! interrog. interjection (question form of "вот")
қош:қош INTERJ ; ! ""
Құдай%-ай:Құдай%-ай INTERJ ; ! ""
мақұл:мақұл INTERJ ; ! "fine/okay"
мә:мә INTERJ ; ! "here you go / take"
мейлі:мейлі INTERJ ; ! "okay/fine"
міне:міне INTERJ ; ! "here is, вот"
мына:мына INTERJ ; ! "here is, вот"
ой:ой INTERJ ; ! "hey"
өй:өй INTERJ ; ! ""
түсінікті:түсінікті INTERJ ; ! "understood"
уа:уа INTERJ ; ! ""
әу:әу INTERJ ; ! ""
ойбай:ойбай INTERJ ; ! ""

! Вводные слова
! =============

айтпақшы:айтпақшы INTERJ ; ! ""
бәлкім:бәлкім INTERJ ; ! ""
есесіне:есесіне INTERJ ; ! ""
мәселен:мәселен INTERJ ; ! "e.g."
мысалы:мысалы INTERJ ; ! "e.g."

!==================!
 LEXICON Ideophones
!==================!

арс:арс IDEO ; ! ""
жарқ:жарқ IDEO ; ! ""

 LEXICON Conjunctions
да:де CC ; ! ""       Dir/LR
да:те CC ; ! ""       Dir/LR
және:жөне CC ; ! "and" Dir/LR FIXME CHECK
сондай%-ақ:сондай%-ақ CC ; ! ""
түгіл:түгілі CC ; ! "не только, но даже" Dir/LR
уа:уа CC ; ! "and"
біресе:біресе CC ; ! "то ... , то ... (x2)"
егерде:егерде CS ; ! "if"
онда:онда CS ; ! "then"
ондай% болса:ондай% болса CS ; ! "in that case"
себебі:себебі CS ; ! "because"    ! FIXME:NOTE: disambig from "себеп.n.px3sg"
яғни:яғни CS ; ! "that is, то есть"
мүбада:мүбада CS ; ! "if"
өйткені:өйткені CS ; ! "because"
әйтпесе:әйтпесе CA ; ! ""
басқаша% айтканда:басқаша% айтканда CA ; ! ""
жазуынша:жазуынша CA ; ! ""
ондықтан:ондықтан CA ; ! "that is why"
сонда:сонда CA ; ! "nevertheless"                  = (tat) шулай да
сөйтсе% де:сөйтсе% де CA ; ! "nevertheless"
айтуларынша:айтуларынша CA ; ! ""
 LEXICON Postpositions
бұрын:бұрын POST ; ! "before, ago" + NOM
қарамағында:қарамағында POST ; ! "" FIXME CHECK
секілді:секілді POST ; ! "like, как будто" + NOM
дейін:дейін POST ; ! "until, up to, as far as" + DAT
қоса:қоса POST ; ! "in addition to" + DAT
бері:бері POST ; ! "since" + ABL
бойда:бойда POST ;
 LEXICON Numerals
төрт:төрт NUM ; ! "four"
сегіз:сегіз NUM ; ! "eight"
он% екі:он% екі NUM ; ! "twelve"
он% алты:он% алты NUM ; ! "sixteen"
жиырма:жиырма NUM-TWENTY ; ! "twenty"
отыз:отыз NUM ; ! "thirty"
жетпіс:жетпіс NUM ; ! "seventy"
мың:мың NUM ; ! "thousand"
триллион:триллион NUM ; ! "trillion"
бір:біреу NUM-COLL ;
екі:екеу NUM-COLL ;
үш:үшеу NUM-COLL ;
төрт:төртеу NUM-COLL ;
бес:бесеу NUM-COLL ;
алты:алтау NUM-COLL ;
жеті:жетеу NUM-COLL ;
III NUM-ROMAN ; ! ""
V NUM-ROMAN ; ! ""
VII NUM-ROMAN ; ! ""
IX NUM-ROMAN ; ! ""
XIII NUM-ROMAN ; ! ""
XVII NUM-ROMAN ; ! ""
XXI NUM-ROMAN ; ! ""
неше:неше NUM-ITG ;
 LEXICON ProperNouns
Васильевич:Василье NP-PAT-VICH ; ! ""
Иванович:Ивано NP-PAT-VICH ; ! ""
Павлович:Павло NP-PAT-VICH ; ! ""
Сергеевич:Сергее NP-PAT-VICH ; ! ""
Янукович:Януко NP-PAT-VICH ; ! ""
Аширбаев:Аширбаев NP-COG-OB ; ! ""
Беловощев:Беловощев NP-COG-OB ; ! ""
Горшков:Горшков NP-COG-OB ; ! ""
Гришин:Гришин NP-COG-IN ; ! ""
Есмамбетов:Есмамбетов NP-COG-OB ; ! ""
Ильин:Ильин NP-COG-IN ; ! ""
Кошелев:Кошелев NP-COG-OB ; ! ""
Кузьмин:Кузьмин NP-COG-IN ; ! ""
Лапин:Лапин NP-COG-IN ; ! ""
Лыткин:Лыткин NP-COG-IN ; ! ""
Молотов:Молотов NP-COG-OB ; ! ""
Мусин:Мусин NP-COG-IN ; ! ""
Рябов:Рябов NP-COG-OB ; ! ""
Сорокин:Сорокин NP-COG-IN ; ! ""
Уалиева:Уалиева NP-COG-OB ; ! ""
Щукин:Щукин NP-COG-IN ; ! ""
Consolidated% Contractors% Company:Consolidated% Contractors% Company NP-ORG ; ! ""
Freedom% House:Freedom% House NP-ORG ; ! ""
Kazakhmys:Kazakhmys NP-ORG ; ! ""
Ақтөбемұнайгаз:Ақтөбемұнайгаз NP-ORG ; ! ""
Голос% Америки:Голос% Америки NP-ORG ; ! ""
Рейтер:Рейтер NP-ORG ; ! ""
Этнодизайн:Этнодизайн NP-ORG ; ! ""
Түрік% Әуежолдары:Түрік% Әуежолдар NP-ORG-COMPOUND ; ! "Turkish Airways"
Боруссия% Дортмунд:Боруссия% Дортмунд%{☭%} NP-ORG ; ! "Borussia Dortmund"
Чемпиондар% лигасы:Чемпиондар% лига NP-ORG-COMPOUND ; ! "UEFA Champions League"
Independent:Independent NP-AL ; ! ""
Petroleum:Petroleum NP-AL ; ! ""
Witness:Witness NP-AL ; ! ""
Взгляд:Взгляд NP-AL ; ! ""
Заря:Заря NP-AL ; ! ""
Мир:Мир NP-AL ; ! ""
Фунтик:Фунтик NP-AL ; ! ""
Тәурат:Тәурат NP-AL ; ! ""
 LEXICON Adverbs
қайдан:қайдан ADVITG ; ! ""
қалай:қалай ADVITG ; ! "how"
нендей:нендей ADVITG ; ! "how"
қашан:қашан ADVITG ; ! "when"
неғұрлым:неғұрлым ADVITG ; ! ""
қаншалық:қаншалық ADVITG ; ! ""
қаншама:қаншама ADVITG ; ! ""
әдейі:әдейі ADV ; ! ""
бірен%-саран:бірен%-саран ADV ; ! ""
жазбаша:жазбаша ADV ; ! ""
қайтадан:қайтадан ADV ; ! "once again"
тағы:тағы ADV ; ! "more"
бұрынғыдай:бұрынғыдай ADV ; ! ""
бағана:бағана ADV-WITH-KI ; ! "just now > the one just now" FIXME: gloss
бүгін:бүгін ADV-WITH-KI ; ! "today > today's"   FIXME: takes abl, dat, ...
бұрын:бұрың ADV-WITH-KI ; ! "earlier" Dir/LR
ежел:ежел ADV-WITH-KI ; ! "ancient"
кейін:кейін ADV-WITH-KI ; ! "after"   FIXME: takes comparative
қазір:қазір ADV-WITH-KI ; ! "now > the one now"
бері:бер ADV-WITH-KI-I ; ! "on the near side"
ертен:ертен ADV-WITH-KI ; ! "tomorrow > tomorow's"  ! Use/MT eng-kaz
мында:мында ADV ; ! "here"  ! Use/MT eng-kaz
 LEXICON Abbreviations
аум%.:аум%. ABBR ; ! ""
ДНҚ:ДНҚ%{а%} ABBR ; ! "DNA"
км³:км³ ABBR ; ! "km³"
ҚХР:ҚХР ABBR ; ! ""
оңт%.:оңт%. ABBR ; ! "оңтүстік,көньяк,south" FIXME:CHECK -->"
ССС:ССС ABBR ; ! ""
EITI:EITI ABBR ; ! ""
